New York, session 2025-2026, S8362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 13 of chapter 554 of the laws of 2 2013, amending the education law and other laws relating to applied 3 behavior analysis, as amended by section 1 of part SSS of chapter 58 of 4 the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 5 a. Nothing in this act shall be construed as prohibiting a person 6 employed or retained by programs licensed, certified, operated, 7 approved, registered or funded and regulated by the office for people 8 with developmental disabilities, the office of children and family 9 services, or the office of mental health from performing the duties of a 10 licensed behavior analyst or a certified behavior analyst assistant in 11 the course of such employment or retention; provided, however, that this 12 section shall not authorize the use of any title authorized pursuant to 13 article 167 of the education law; and provided further, however, that 14 this section shall be deemed repealed on July 1, [2025] 2030. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13003-01-5